Utah statutes.
48-2c-701.   Nature of member interest.

(1)  A member's interest in a company is personal property regardless of the nature of the property owned by the company.

(2)  A member has no interest in specific property of a company.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

